app/utils/MuseScoreWindows/tables/sw-ke-g1-2.ctb
# liblouis: Swahili (Kenya) (Grade 1.2)
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#-index-name: Swahili, contracted, grade 1.2
#-display-name: Swahili grade 1.2 contracted braille
#
#-author: Jake Kyle
#-author: Dipendra Manocha
#-author: Martin Kieti
#-maintainer: Jake Kyle <jake@compassbraille.org>
#-updated: 2022
#
#+language:sw
#+region:sw-KE
#+type:literary
#+grade:1.2
#+contraction: partial
#
#-copyright: 2022, Compass Braille <http://www.compassbraille.org>
#-copyright: 2022, the DAISY Consortium <https://daisy.org/>
#-license: LGPLv2.1
#
# Copyright (C) 2022 by Compass Braille <http://www.compassbraille.org>
# Copyright (C) 2022 by the DAISY Consortium <https://daisy.org/>
#
# With contributions from DAISY Consortium under project supported by Microsoft.
#
# This table was created using information contained in a document entitled
# "Kenya Swahili Braille Code" (see <http://liblouis.org/braille-specs/swahili/>)
# which was derived from the Kenya Institute of Curriculum Development's Swahili
# Braille Manual: “Mwongozo wa Breli Ya Kiswahili”.
#
# The Braille code is graded into 6 grades: 1, 1.2, 1.3, 1.4, 1.5 and 2. This is
# in line with the Kenya Institute of Curriculum Development’s Curriculum
# Designs for Kiswahili Braille. 
#
# The Braille code in the document was adopted at a Stakeholders Workshop held
# at the Swiss Lenana Mount Hotel on 25th August 2022.
#

include sw-ke-g1.utb


# Single Character Word Signs Part 1
# The following characters represent words commonly used in Swahili language.
# They represent these words when they stand alone, that is, when they are
# preceeded and followed by a space. 

word bora 12 b
word chai 14 c
word dawa 145 d
word elfu 15 e
word fora 124 f
word gogo 1245 g
word homa 125 h
word imani 24 i
word jambo 245 j
word kilimo 13 k
word ladha 123 l
word maji 134 m
word neno 1345 n
word orodha 135 o
word pilipili 1234 p
word kwamba 12345 kw
word roho 1235 r
word somo 234 s
word taarifa 2345 t
# word ushirika 136 u may be confused with word 'u'
word vyema 1236 v
word wizara 2456 w
word mbegu 1346 mb
word yai 13456 y
word ziwa 1356 z

# -- end of table --
